Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
General Provisions; Additions to and Deletions from State Highway System, 1954-1971
Mississippi 475 – Begins at a point on Mississippi 468 and extends in a northerly direction to I-20, thence northerly along the western boundary line of the Jackson Municipal Airport (Allen C. Thompson Field) to a point on Mississippi 25, all in Rankin County.

Mississippi 476 – Begins at or near Van Winkle and extends easterly to the west corporate limits of Jackson, as the corporate limits were in 1949, all in Hinds County.

Mississippi 477 – West Rankin Parkway (New Route)–Begins at Mississippi 25 in the City of Flowood, thence south to U.S. 80 at Pearson Road in the City of Pearl, all in Rankin County.

Mississippi 478 – Begins about three miles east of Rockport in Simpson County, and extends in an easterly direction to a point on Mississippi 43.

Mississippi 481 – Begins on Mississippi 43, Rankin County, and extends east to the Rankin-Scott county line to Morton, Pulaski, Trenton, Burns and intersects Mississippi 35, Smith County.

Mississippi 482 – Begins on Mississippi 16 east of Philadelphia where Sandtown Road leaves Mississippi 16, thence in a northeasterly direction to intersect with Mississippi 491 near Bogue Chitto Indian School; all in Neshoba County. Also begins on Mississippi 19 south of Philadelphia near the Neshoba County Hospital and extends in a northeasterly direction to intersect present Mississippi 482 about one and three-tenths miles north of its intersection with Mississippi 16. This route is now numbered Mississippi 894.

Mississippi 483 – Begins at a point on Mississippi 13 at Forkville, thence in a northwesterly direction to Ludlow, Scott County.

Mississippi 484 – Begins on Mississippi 488 west of Madden, Leake County, thence through the community of Wright’s Springs and thence easterly to the Neshoba county line at the intersection of Mississippi 488 and Mississippi 427.

Mississippi 485 – Begins on Mississippi 21, thence in a northeasterly direction to Mississippi 15 at Good Hope, Neshoba County.

Mississippi 486 – Begins on Mississippi 16 east of Philadelphia, thence southeasterly to the intersection of Mississippi 491, all in Neshoba County.

Mississippi 487 – Begins at or near Lena, Leake County, thence northeasterly to or near Tuscola and Carthage, thence in an easterly direction by Standing Pine, Rosebud and Salem, thence in a southeasterly direction to the intersection of Mississippi 21 at Sebastopol, Scott County.

Mississippi 488– Begins at or near Mississippi 35 at Carthage, Leake County, and extends to or near Madden, Laurel Hill, and to a point on Mississippi 21 approximately two miles west of Williamsville, Neshoba County.

Mississippi 489 – Begins at or near Lake, Scott County, and extends northeast to or near Conehatta to Union, Newton County.

Mississippi 490 – Begins at or near Noxapater, Winston County, thence in an easterly direction to intersect Mississippi 397, thence in a northeasterly direction by Old Fearn Springs Post Office to the Noxubee county line.

Mississippi 491 – Begins on Mississippi 19, approximately 200 yards south of the Neshoba-Newton county line, thence in a northerly direction to Mississippi 486 southwest of DeWeese and thence from Mississippi 16 at Cross Roads north to Mississippi 21 near the center of Section 22, Township 12 North, Range 13 East, Neshoba County.

Mississippi 492 – Begins at the intersection of Mississippi 487 at or near Tuscola, Leake County, and runs in an easterly direction to or near Walnut Grove and to the south boundary of Golden State Park and continues as Golden State Park Road until it reaches Mississippi 21. Then from a point on Mississippi 21 at or near Sebastopol to or near Union and ends at or near House School east of Mississippi 19, Neshoba County.

Mississippi 493 – Begins at or near Meridian, Lauderdale County, thence in a northerly direction to or near Bailey and Moscow, and ends on Mississippi 16 in Kemper County.

Mississippi 494 – Begins on Mississippi 15 at or near Union, Newton County, and extends southeast to or near Little Rock and Dufee to intersect Mississippi 19 at or near Hookston, Lauderdale County.

Mississippi 495 – Begins on Mississippi 493 at Bailey’s Store, in Lauderdale County, thence in a northerly direction to the Kemper county line, thence by Damacus School and intersection Mississippi 16 at or near Daw’s Store and from another point on Mississippi 16 at Daw’s Brothers Store, thence northerly to a point on Mississippi 397 approximately one and one-half miles south of Preston, Kemper County.

Mississippi 496 – Begins at the intersection of Mississippi 19 in Lauderdale County at Old Odom Store Place, thence in an easterly direction by way of Culpepper, thence to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, Lauderdale County.

Mississippi 498 – Begins at a point on U.S. 45 about 12 miles south of Scooba, Kemper County, thence in an easterly direction to Porterville.

Mississippi 500 – Begins with its intersection with Mississippi 13 at or near Lena, thence in a easterly direction to a local road at Frank Reeves’, thence in a northerly direction to Mississippi 487 at Tuscola, Leake County.

Mississippi 501 – Begins on Mississippi 18 approximately eight miles east of Raleigh and extends in a northerly direction to or near Pineville to U.S. 80 in Forest.

Mississippi 502 – Begins with its intersection with Mississippi 488 between Standing Pine and Free Trade, thence in an easterly direction by Springfield Baptist Church, Thaggards Clinic, Madden School and intersects Mississippi 488 at Madden Baptist Church in the Village of Madden, all in Leake County.

Mississippi 503 – Begins on Mississippi 528 at or near Heidelberg, Jasper County, thence in a northerly direction to Paulding, Hero, Hickory and ends at or near Decatur, Newton County.

Mississippi 504 – Begins on Mississippi 15 north of Jasper-Newton county line to Mississippi 503 at Hero, Jasper County.

Mississippi 505 – Begins at or near Roberts, Newton County, and extends north to U.S. 80 at or near Lawrence.

Mississippi 508 – Begins on U.S. 45 approximately six miles south of Waynesboro and runs southeasterly approximately three miles to Waynesboro Pine Tree Nursery, all in Wayne County.

Mississippi 510 – Begins on U.S. 45 at or near Shubuta in Wayne County, thence in an easterly direction to Matherville, thence in a southerly direction to the end of state maintenance, Wayne County.

Mississippi 511 – Begins at a point on Mississippi 18 at or near Quitman, Clarke County, thence in a southeasterly direction about seven and two-tenths miles, now known as the Quitman-Crandall Road in Clarke County.

Mississippi 512 – Begins on the Clarke-Jasper county line, thence easterly on the Old Paulding and Pachuta Road to Mississippi 18 at Pachuta, thence continues jointly with Mississippi 18 approximately two miles southeast of Pachuta, thence to U.S. 45 in Quitman, Clarke County.

Mississippi 513 – Begins on Mississippi 18 in the Town of Rose Hill, Jasper County, thence to Enterprise on U.S. 11 and extends southeasterly to or near Quitman, Clarke County.

Mississippi 514 – Begins at a point on Mississippi 513 in Enterprise, thence in an easterly direction to a point on U.S. 45 near the northeast corner of the southeast quarter of Section 20, Township 4 North, Range 16 East, all in Clarke County.

Mississippi 528 – Begins at or near Bay Springs and extends to U.S. 11 at or near Heidelberg, all in Jasper County.

Mississippi 529 – Begins with its intersection on U.S. 84 at or near Hebron community, thence in a northerly direction to Mississippi 28 at Gitano, Jones County.

Mississippi 531 – Begins on Mississippi 28 approximately one mile east of Taylorsville in Smith County, thence in a northeasterly direction to the intersection with Mississippi 18 approximately three miles west of Bay Springs, Jasper County.

Mississippi 532 – Begins at or near Mt. Olive, Covington County, and extends southeasterly via Hot Coffee, ending at U.S. 84 at or near Reddoch, Covington County.

Mississippi 533 – Begins where it intersects Mississippi 28 at or near Soso, Jones County, thence in a northerly direction along the Ridge Road to Mississippi 15 at or near Stringer, Jasper County.

Mississippi 535 – Begins at Seminary, thence in a northeasterly direction to a point on Mississippi 588, all in Covington County.

Mississippi 536 – Begins on Mississippi 15 in Section 12, Township 7 North, Range 11 West, in Jones County, and extending in a northerly and southeasterly direction to Mississippi 63 in Wayne County in Section 26, Township 7 North, Range 8 West.

Mississippi 537 – Begins at or near Laurel, Jones County, and extends northerly to the Jones-Jasper county line, thence northwesterly and southwesterly via Mossville to Mississippi 15, Jones County.

Mississippi 540 – Begins at the intersection of Mississippi 469 at Harrisville, Simpson County, and extends easterly to Old U.S. 49 and Mississippi 13 at or near Mendenhall, thence southeasterly to new U.S. 49, thence in a northerly and easterly direction to a point on Mississippi 541 at Roy Upton’s Store, thence northeasterly and easterly to intersect Mississippi 35 south of Raleigh, Smith County.

Mississippi 541 – Begins approximately five miles south of the Simpson county line in Jefferson Davis County, thence in a northerly direction to or near Magee, Martinville and to intersect Mississippi 18 southeast of Puckett, and from another point on Mississippi 18 at or near White Oak, thence in a northwesterly direction to intersect Mississippi 13 north of Puckett, Smith County.

Mississippi 545 – Begins at the intersection with Mississippi 28 in Simpson County, thence in a northerly direction for a distance of approximately two miles along the State Farm Road by and through the State Sanatorium Farm to a point of intersection with U.S. 49, all in Simpson County.

Mississippi 547 – Begins at or near Port Gibson, Claiborne County, and extends southeasterly via Pattison to or near Allen, thence from a point on Mississippi 28 at or near Allen and extending in an easterly direction to Copiah-Lincoln county line.

Mississippi 548 – Begins four miles east of Mississippi 18 at or near Hermanville, Claiborne County, thence easterly to the Claiborne-Copiah county line.

Mississippi 550 – Begins on Mississippi 28 at or near Union Church, Jefferson County, and extends southeasterly to or near Brookhaven, Lincoln County.

Mississippi 552 – Begins at the Mississippi River at or near the mouth of Bayou Pierre, Claiborne County, thence easterly then southerly on the Port Gibson-Alcorn University Road, and extends southerly to Alcorn State University, thence southeasterly to or near Lorman, thence in an easterly direction to Red Lick, thence near Blue Hill, and continues from McBride and intersects Mississippi 28 at Pleasant Hill, Jefferson County.

Mississippi 553 – Begins on U.S. 61 at or near Stanton, Adams County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near Church Hill, thence in an easterly direction to Fayette, thence in a northerly direction to Harriston, Jefferson County.

Mississippi 554 – Begins at or near Pine Ridge and extends to U.S. 61 at or near Selma, all in Adams County.

Mississippi 555 – Begins at the road junction in Section 50, Township 6 North, Range 2 West, and extends in a northwesterly direction to U.S. 61 south of Natchez and from another point in Natchez, northeasterly to Pine Ridge, and thence three and eight-tenths miles north to Old Pine Ridge School, all in Adams County.

Mississippi 556 – Begins on Mississippi 184 at or near Meadville, thence in a southeasterly direction to intersect U.S. 98, all in Franklin County.

Mississippi 558 – Begins west of I-55 and extends along Brookway Boulevard to U.S. 51, thence continues to Mississippi 184 (Monticello Street), all in Brookhaven, Lincoln County.

Mississippi 563 – Begins on U.S. 61 approximately three miles north of Woodville, thence to Wilkinson in a northeasterly direction to or near Crosby, all in Wilkinson County.

Mississippi 567 – Begins on Mississippi 24 at or near Liberty, Amite County, and runs in a northerly direction to U.S. 98 south of Bude, Franklin County, except that section from Butler’s Crossing, easterly to Zion Hill Baptist Church.

Mississippi 568 – Begins at the Mississippi-Louisiana state line in Amite County and extends in a northeasterly direction to or near Gillsburg and ends on U.S. 51 south of Magnolia, Pike County.

Mississippi 569 – Begins on Mississippi-Louisiana state line, Amite County, and extends in a northeasterly direction to Mississippi 48 at or near Beachwood, and from Mississippi 24 at or near Liberty in a northeasterly direction to Smithdale to intersect U.S. 98 at or near Auburn, Lincoln County.

Mississippi 570 – Begins on U.S. 98 in Franklin County, thence in a southeasterly direction to or near Smithdale and McComb, thence from a point on Mississippi 44 in McComb to or near Felders and to intersect Mississippi 44 at or near Pricedale, Pike County.

Mississippi 571 – Begins at a point approximately one mile east of Gillsburg on Mississippi 584 and runs in a southerly direction to connect with Louisiana 441, all in Amite County.

Mississippi 575 – Begins at Progress, thence northeasterly for a distance of approximately four miles to a point of intersection with Mississippi 48, all in Pike County.

Mississippi 583 – Begins at or near Brookhaven, Lincoln County, thence in a southeasterly direction through Enterprise and Ruth to intersect Mississippi 44 at Alton Brister’s Store, thence southeasterly to or near Tylertown, Walthall County.

Mississippi 584 – Begins at Liberty, Amite County, and runs in a southeasterly direction to or near Gillsburg, then to U.S. 51 at or near Osyka, Pike County.

Mississippi 585 – Begins on U.S. 98 east of Tylertown, thence in a northeasterly direction to intersect Mississippi 586 at or near Darbon, all in Walthall County.

Mississippi 586 – Begins at or near Darbon on Mississippi 585, thence in a southeasterly direction to U.S. 98 at or near Foxworth, Marion County.

Mississippi 587 – Begins on U.S. 98 at Foxworth, Marion County, thence northwesterly to Morgantown, Whitebluff, Tilton and Robinwood to connect with U.S. 84 in Monticello, Lawrence County.

Mississippi 588 – Begins on U.S. 84 approximately one mile east of Collins, Covington County, thence in an easterly direction to or near Ellisville, Jones County.

Mississippi 589 – Begins at a point on I-59 at or near Purvis, Lamar County, thence in a northwesterly direction to intersect U.S. 98, thence continues northerly to or near Sumrall, then north to U.S. 49 at or near Seminary, Covington County.

Mississippi 590 – Begins at a point on U.S. 49 at or near Seminary, Covington County, and extends in an easterly direction to a point on U.S. 11 at or near Ellisville, Jones County.

Mississippi 591 – Begins on Mississippi 570 at Felder’s Camp Ground, thence northerly approximately two-tenths mile, all in Pike County.

Mississippi 594 – Begins on Mississippi 63 south of Leakesville and runs easterly to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, all in Greene County.

Mississippi 598 – Begins on U.S. 49 at a point west of Sanford, continues in an easterly direction to another point at Sanford, all in Covington County.

Mississippi 601 – A central Harrison County connector from I-10 to U.S. 90 in the vicinity of Canal Road to the Mississippi State Port at Gulfport.

Mississippi 603 – Begins on Mississippi 43 at or near Kiln and extends in a northerly direction to or near Necaise, all in Hancock County.

Mississippi 604 – Begins on U.S. 90 at or near the Mississippi-Louisiana state line and extends in a northeasterly direction to the Picayune-Bay St. Louis Road near Westonia, all in Hancock County.

Mississippi 605 – Begins on U.S. 90 at Cowan Road in Gulfport, thence in a northerly direction along Cowan and Lorraine Roads to I-10, thence continuing to relocated/reconstructed Mississippi 67, northwest to relocated Mississippi 67 at or near U.S. 49, all in Harrison County.

Mississippi 606 – Begins at the southern end of the Beach Highway in Hancock County, thence in a northeasterly direction across U.S. 90 to the northern end of Beach Highway.

Mississippi 607 – Begins on U.S. 90 west of Bay St. Louis and runs in a westerly and northwesterly direction to I-10 south of N.A.S.A., thence from the intersection with unnumbered state highway at Santa Rosa north of N.A.S.A. to a point on I-59 at or near Nicholson, all in Hancock County.

Mississippi 609 – Begins on U.S. 90 in Ocean Springs, thence north to I-10 and thence from the north end of the bridge over Bayou Costapia and extends northerly along what is known as the Old Spanish Trail Highway to approximately three-tenths mile south of George-Jackson county line, all in Jackson County.

Mississippi 611 – Begins at the entrance to H. K. Porter Company, Inc., plant site in the Bayou Cassotte Industrial Area at Station 220-00, thence in a northerly direction for a distance of approximately four miles to intersect U.S. 90 at a point about one mile west of Kreole, thence westerly on U.S. 90 to intersect Chico Road, thence northerly on Chico Road and ends on Mississippi 613 south of Moss Point, all in Jackson County to be designated as Mississippi 613.

Mississippi 612 – Begins on Mississippi 613 at or near Hathaway’s Store, thence in an easterly direction to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, all in George County.

Mississippi 613 – Begins on U.S. 90 in Pascagoula, Jackson County, thence northerly via Call Town, Bigpoint, Hurley, Harleston and Agricola to Mississippi 198 at Lucedale, George County.

Mississippi 614 – Begins at Wade on Mississippi 63, thence in an easterly direction to or near Hurley, thence to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, all in Jackson County.

Mississippi 615 – An east Harrison County connector from U.S. 90 to I-10 to be located between the Cowan-Lorraine Road interchange and the I-110 interchange, thence northerly to relocated/reconstructed Mississippi 67.

Mississippi 617 – Begins at Litton Industries, Inc., between West Pascagoula River and East Pascagoula River in the City of Pascagoula and extends north to U.S. 90, all in Jackson County.

Mississippi 618– Mississippi 613 Spur–Begins on Mississippi 613 in Moss Point and extends east to U.S. 90 at Orange Grove, Jackson County.

Mississippi 619 – Spur – Extends south to Naval Station, also known as Singing River Island Causeway, all in Jackson County.

Mississippi 621 – Begins I-10 and extends in a northerly direction to North Swan Road ending on U.S. 49 at or near Lyman, all in Harrison County.

Mississippi 701 – Begins at the intersection of U.S. 78 with Mulberry Street in the Town of Potts Camp, thence southwesterly along Mulberry Street to Front Street, thence southeasterly along Front Street to Ash Street, thence northerly to Mississippi 178, all in Marshall County.

Mississippi 702– Mississippi 5 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 7 and extends east to Michigan City, Benton County.

Mississippi 703 – Begins at or near Byhalia Cemetery on Mississippi 178 in the north part of the City of Byhalia, thence runs southeasterly down Main Street to Hood’s Store on U.S. 78, all in Marshall County.

Mississippi 704 – Begins on Mississippi 7, thence in an easterly direction, approximately one-half mile to Lamar, Benton County.

Mississippi 705 – Loop – All in the Town of Hickory Flat off Mississippi 178 in Benton County.

Mississippi 706 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 49E and extends west to Sidon, Leflore County.

Mississippi 713– Mississippi 304 Spur – Extends southwesterly to or near Robinsonville, Tunica County, from Mississippi 304.

Mississippi 714– Mississippi 3 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 3 and extends west into Sledge, Quitman County.

Mississippi 716– Mississippi 315 Spur–Begins on Mississippi 315 thence west to Quitman-Tunica county line.

Mississippi 718– U.S. 51 Spur – Begins on U.S. 51 and extends west to Courtland, Panola County.

Mississippi 720 – I-55 Connection – Begins on I-55 and extends west to U.S. 51 between Courtland and Pope, Panola County.

Mississippi 722 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 51 and extends west to Pope, Panola County.

Mississippi 723 – Begins at a point on Mississippi 32 approximately eight miles northwest of Bruce, Calhoun County, runs north of Gulf Interstate Gas Pumping Station.

Mississippi 724– U.S. 51 Spur – Begins on U.S. 51 north of Oakland, Yalobusha County, and extends west into Enid, Tallahatchie County.

Mississippi 725–Mississippi 6 Spur–Begins on Mississippi 6 and extends north to Batesville, Panola County.

Mississippi 726– U.S. 49 Spur – Begins on U.S. 49 and extends south to Tutwiler, Tallahatchie County.

Mississippi 727– Mississippi 32 Connection – Begins on Mississippi 32, Tallahatchie County, and extends east to U.S. 51 in Oakland, Yalobusha County.

Mississippi 728– U.S. 49E Spur – Begins on U.S. 49E and extends east into Sumner, Tallahatchie County.

Mississippi 729 – Begins on U.S. 51 and extends northeasterly to I-55, all in Grenada County.

Mississippi 731– Mississippi 35 Connection – Begins on Mississippi 35 in South Kosciusko and extends north to Mississippi 12, all in Attala County.

Mississippi 732 – Begins on Mississippi 35 approximately three and one-half miles south of Charleston, thence runs in an easterly direction to Camp Tallaha, Tallahatchie County.

Mississippi 733 – Begins at the junction of Old Taylor-Oxford Road with Mississippi 328 near the railroad overpass southwest of Taylor and extends in a northerly direction approximately one mile to an intersection in Taylor, Lafayette County.

Mississippi 734 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 49E and extends east into Glendora, Tallahatchie County.

Mississippi 735– Mississippi 12 Loop – Begins on Mississippi 12 and extends east and north to Mississippi 12 in Kosciusko, Attala County.

Mississippi 736 – Begins on Mississippi 35 south of the Yockanookany River, then runs easterly through Williamsville to Mississippi 14, all in Attala County.

Mississippi 737 –Begins on Mississippi 178 at or near Red Banks, thence through the business district of Red Banks and ends on Mississippi 178, all in Marshall County.

Mississippi 738– Mississippi 6 Connection–Begins on Mississippi 6 and extends west to Mississippi 334 in East Oxford, Lafayette County.

Mississippi 739 – Loop – Begins on Mississippi 12 and extends east and north through Ethel, Attala County, to Mississippi 12.

Mississippi 741 – Begins at a point at or near Gilliland Hill approximately five miles south of the corporate limits of the City of Kosciusko, Mississippi, thence runs in an easterly direction to Old Mississippi 35, thence in a northerly direction to Texas Eastern Pumping Station, all in Attala County.

Mississippi 743 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 82 in South Greenwood at U.S. 49E and extends north, all in Leflore County.

Mississippi 744 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 82 in East Greenwood and extends west on East Stone Street, all in Leflore County.

Mississippi 745– Mississippi 182 Connection – Begins on Mississippi 182 and extends southeast to Mississippi 413 in the Town of Kilmichael, all in Montgomery County.

Mississippi 747 – That portion of Getwell Road from the Mississippi-Tennessee state line south to its intersection with Church Road, all in DeSoto County.

Mississippi 758– Mississippi 25 Connection–Begins on Mississippi 25 and extends southwest .310 mile to a local road.

Mississippi 759– Mississippi 12 Loop – Begins on Mississippi 12 and extends east and north to Mississippi 12 through Ackerman, all in Choctaw County.

Mississippi 760– Mississippi 25 Connection – Begins on Mississippi 25 south of Belmont and extends east to Golden as Mississippi 366, all in Tishomingo County.

Mississippi 761– Mississippi 178 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 178 and extends north to Myrtle, all in Union County.

Mississippi 762– Mississippi 15 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 15 and extends west to Ingomar, Union County.

Mississippi 763– U.S. 82 Connection – Begins on U.S. 82 and extends northwest to Mississippi 15 in Maben, Oktibbeha County.

Mississippi 764– Mississippi 9 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 9 in Blue Springs, Union County, and extends north.

Mississippi 765 – Begins at the Natchez Trace Parkway, runs thence easterly for a distance of approximately 2,800 feet to or near Bland’s Store, in the Village of Cumberland, all in Webster County.

Mississippi 766 – Begins in the Town of Saltillo at Mississippi 363, and runs in a northerly direction to the intersection of Mississippi 145, all in Lee County.

Mississippi 767 – Begins at the intersection of Ridgeroad and Mississippi 25, Tishomingo County, thence southeasterly along Ridgeroad to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, Itawamba County.

Mississippi 768 – Begins on Mississippi 15 south of Ackerman, thence in an easterly direction past Choctaw Lake to the 4-H Club Picnic Grounds. This includes a spur past the clubhouse and ends at the picnic grounds, all in Choctaw County.

Mississippi 769 – Begins at or near the south corporate limits of Tupelo and extends over Old U.S. 45, proceeds to Green Street in Tupelo, through Tupelo on Green Street to the intersection of Green Street and Mississippi 145 near the north corporate limits of Tupelo, all in Lee County.

Mississippi 770 – Connection – Begins on Mississippi 15 and extends west to the intersection of Mississippi 6 and 9 in the Town of Pontotoc, all in Pontotoc County.

Mississippi 772– Mississippi 15 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 15 and extends west to Algoma, Pontotoc County.

Mississippi 773 –Commences at the intersection of Center Road and Mississippi 2 and extends northeasterly along Center Road for about two miles to its intersection with Peoples Farm to Market Road, all in Tippah County.

Mississippi 774– U.S. 45 Connection – Begins on U.S. 45 and extends east to Mississippi 6 in the Town of Nettleton, Lee/Monroe County.

Mississippi 775– Mississippi 12 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 12 and extends east at Mississippi State University in Starkville on Old Mississippi 12, all in Oktibbeha County.

Mississippi 776 – Begins at the intersection of Old Mississippi 6 and new Mississippi 6, thence runs northeast along Old Mississippi 6 to its intersection with Mississippi 371, all in Monroe County.

Mississippi 777 – Begins at or near the southern boundary of the Town of Walnut at or near the intersection of old and new Mississippi 15, follows the route of Old Mississippi 15, and runs through the business section of Walnut and in a northerly direction to intersect U.S. 72, all in Tippah County.

Mississippi 778 – Begins at U.S. 78 in Section 22, Township 8 South, Range 4 East, thence in a southeasterly direction in the vicinity of Old U.S. 78 to intersect U.S. 78, or Mississippi 9, at or near Sherman.

Mississippi 779 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 72 and extends north to Glen, Alcorn County.

Mississippi 781– Mississippi 50 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 50 near Cedar Bluff and extends to State Lime Plant, all in Clay County.

Mississippi 782– Mississippi 15 Connection–Begins on Mississippi 15 and extends west in Mantee, Webster County.

Mississippi 784– Mississippi 9 Loop – Begins on Mississippi 9 and extends east and north across Mississippi 50 and back to Mississippi 9 in the Town of Walthall, Webster County.

Mississippi 785– U.S. 72 Spur – Begins on U.S. 72 in Corinth and extends north on Davis Street and Cass Street to Wick Street, all in Alcorn County.

Mississippi 786 – Begins at a point on U.S. 45, and runs west at distance of approximately 1.27 miles to the Columbus Air Force Base, all in Lowndes County.

Mississippi 788– U.S. 45A Spur – Begins on U.S. 45A and extends east to Artesia, Lowndes County.

Mississippi 789 – Begins on U.S. 82 and extends southeasterly along Airport Road and Industrial Park Road to Artesia Road, thence northeasterly along Artesia Road to U.S. 45.

Mississippi 790– Mississippi 9 Connection – Begins on Mississippi 9 and extends northeast to Mississippi 15 north of Ackerman, Choctaw County.

Mississippi 792 – Begins on U.S. 45 and extends easterly along Carson Road, for a distance of approximately four and one-half miles to the new Weyerhauser Road, Lowndes County, thence continues south to Mississippi 388 in Noxubee County.

Mississippi 793– Mississippi 30 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 30 west of Tishomingo and extends north to Paden, Tishomingo County.

Mississippi 795 – Mississippi Economic and Community Development Highway Project No. DECD-0044(19)B located from Eka Chemical Plant entrance on Nashville Ferry Road located in Section 11, Township 19 South, Range 18 West, northerly along Nashville Ferry Road until it intersects with Pickensville Road, thence northerly along Pickensville Road (existing and relocated) until it intersects with Yorkville Road, thence east along Yorkville Road to U.S. 69 located in Section 26, Township 18 South, Range 18 West, for a total length of 4.419 miles.

Mississippi 801 – Begins on Mississippi 27 north of Crystal Springs, Copiah County, thence north to Copiah-Hinds county line. This was Old U.S. 51.

Mississippi 802– U.S. 61 Spur – Begins on U.S. 61 and extends northwest into the Town of Alligator, Bolivar County.

Mississippi 804– Mississippi 1 Loop – A loop on Mississippi 1 at Gunnison, Bolivar County.

Mississippi 806 – Begins at the intersection of the south end of new U.S. 49W bypass just south of Isola, thence into Isola to the north end of U.S. 49 bypass, Humphreys County.

Mississippi 808 – Begins on U.S. 61 in Port Gibson, thence west to Market Street, thence in a northeasterly direction along Market Street, thence to U.S. 61 approximately three-fourths mile north of Port Gibson, all in Claiborne County.

Mississippi 809 – Industrial access road from the port and industrial area to U.S. 82 in Greenville, Washington County.

Mississippi 810 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 49W and extends west to Sunflower, Sunflower County.

Mississippi 812 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 49W and extends north into Ruleville, Sunflower County.

Mississippi 814 – Begins on Mississippi 1 north of Greenville and extends south to north corporate limits of Greenville as Old Mississippi 1 Business Route, thence extends along North Broadway Street in a southerly direction, to the intersection of U.S. 82 and the south corporate limits of Greenville, thence runs easterly to Mississippi 1, all in Washington County.

Mississippi 816– Mississippi 149 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 149 and extends west to Inverness, Sunflower County.

Mississippi 817– Mississippi 8 Spur – Begins at Pace and extends north to Mississippi 8, all in Bolivar County.

Mississippi 818– U.S. 49E Spur – Begins on U.S. 49E and extends west to Cruger, Holmes County.

Mississippi 819 – Begins on Mississippi 548 in Hermanville, thence extends northward to Mississippi 18 at Hermanville, Claiborne County.

Mississippi 820 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 49W and extends west to Drew, Sunflower County.

Mississippi 822 – Begins four-tenths mile west of the intersection of I-20 and U.S. 80 on West Street and extends east approximately six and two-tenths miles, all in Warren County.

Mississippi 824– U.S. 61 Spur – Begins on U.S. 61 and extends west in Anguilla, Sharkey County.

Mississippi 826 – Begins at a point on Mississippi 14 approximately one mile west of Rolling Fork and runs south to U.S. 61 south of Rolling Fork, all in Sharkey County.

Mississippi 828– U.S. 49E Spur – Begins on U.S. 49E and extends west to Yazoo City, Yazoo County.

Mississippi 830– U.S. 49 Loop – Begins on U.S. 49 and extends east and north to U.S. 49 at and in Bentonia, Yazoo County.

Mississippi 832 – Connection – Begins on U.S. 49W and extends into Doddsville, Sunflower County.

Mississippi 834 – A truck route from Harbor Industrial Park to U.S. 61 north, Warren County.

Mississippi 835 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 49E and extends north to Tchula, Holmes County.

Mississippi 844– U.S. 51 Loop – Begins at I-55 south of Crystal Springs and extends east across U.S. 51 and north to U.S. 51 in Crystal Springs, all in Copiah County.

Mississippi 848 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 51 in Beauregard and extends south on North Street, all in Copiah County.

Mississippi 850 – A route from the Wesson Campus of Copiah-Lincoln Junior College directly to U.S. 51, all in Copiah County.

Mississippi 852– U.S. 45A Loop – Begins on U.S. 45A in Brooksville and extends south and east to U.S. 45 at Brooksville, all in Noxubee County.

Mississippi 853 – Begins at the point where Mississippi 16 intersects the gravel road and runs along Sections 35 and 36, Township 11 North, Range 12 East, Neshoba County, and runs south along the section lines between Sections 35 and 36 and between Sections 1 and 2, Township 10 North, Range 12 East, to the intersection of the gravel road with Mississippi 486, all in Neshoba County.

Mississippi 854 – Begins at its intersection with Mississippi 39 at or near Lizelia and extends easterly approximately three and one-half miles to the United States Naval Auxiliary Air Station, Lauderdale County. The Transportation Commission shall maintain, construct, take over and assume jurisdiction of such highway in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as set out in Sections 65-1-75 and 65-3-3. Such highway shall remain under the jurisdiction of the Transportation Commission for as long as the highway is used to provide access to the United States Naval Auxiliary Air Station or to any other United States government facility.

Mississippi 855– Mississippi 890 Connection – Between Mississippi 890 in Bolton and I-20 north of Bolton, Hinds County.

Mississippi 878– Mississippi 35 Connection – Begins on Mississippi 35 and extends east and north to Mississippi 35 in Walnut Grove, Leake County.

Mississippi 881– U.S. 80 Connection – Begins on U.S. 80 west of Newton and extends southeast approximately two-tenths mile, all in Newton County.

Mississippi 882 – Loop – Begins on Mississippi 35 and extends west and north to Mississippi 35 at Harperville, Scott County.

Mississippi 883 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 80 and extends south on Decatur Street, Newton County. Was Old Mississippi 15.

Mississippi 884– U.S. 45 Spur – Begins on U.S. 45 and extends south toward Marion, Lauderdale County.

Mississippi 885– Mississippi 16 Connection – Begins on Mississippi 16 west of Philadelphia and extends northwest to intersect with Mississippi 15, all in Neshoba County.

Mississippi 886 – Begins at the intersection of I-55 in the Town of Ridgeland thence runs in an easterly direction to U.S. 51 and Jackson Avenue, all in Madison County.

Mississippi 888– Mississippi 13 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 13 and extends west at Roosevelt State Park south of Morton, Scott County.

Mississippi 889 – I-20 Connection – Begins at the junction of U.S. 80 and Adams Street in Chunky, thence north to I-20, all in Newton County.

Mississippi 890– U.S. 80 Connection – Frontage Road Connection at Bolton, Hinds County.

Mississippi 892– Mississippi 35 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 35 and extends east to Homewood, Scott County.

Mississippi 894 – Begins on Mississippi 19 south of Philadelphia near the Neshoba County Hospital and extends in a northeasterly direction to intersect present Mississippi 482 about one and three-tenths miles north of its intersection with Mississippi 16.

Mississippi 895 – Begins at road intersection with U.S. 11 and 80 near the center of Section 26, Township 7 North, Range 17 East, thence northwesterly, northeasterly and southeasterly through Sections 23, 24, 25 and 26 to intersection of U.S. 11 and U.S. 80 in the northeast quarter of the southeast quarter of Section 25, Township 7 North, Range 17 East, Lauderdale County.

Mississippi 897 – Begins on Mississippi 496 in Section 11 and continues through Section 13, all in Township 6 North, Range 18 East, to the Mississippi-Alabama state line.

Mississippi 902– Mississippi 35 Connection – Begins on Mississippi 35 at Lorena and extends southwest to Mississippi 481 at Burns, all in Smith County.

Mississippi 903 – Begins on U.S. 84 approximately three miles west of Monticello, thence runs in a northerly direction to Lake Mary Crawford, all in Lawrence County.

Mississippi 904 – Begins at Lake Lincoln Road, Lincoln County, proceeds easterly to Mississippi 27 at or near Wanilla, Lawrence County.

Mississippi 905 – Begins at the intersection of Adams Road with U.S. 51, thence west to Wardlaw Road, and thence continues north to Mississippi 24, all in Pike County.

Mississippi 906 – Begins on U.S. 51 in Summit and runs in an easterly direction to intersect Mississippi 570, all in Pike County.

Mississippi 908 – A route providing direct access from the interchange at I-55 at or near Summit to Southwest Community College, all in Pike County.

Mississippi 911 – Begins on Mississippi 24, now Mississippi 33 in South Gloster, and extends northwest on Kahnville Road, Amite County.

Mississippi 913 – Spur – Begins on Mississippi 24, now Mississippi 33 in East Gloster, and extends west to Liberty Road, Amite County.

Mississippi 915– Mississippi 42 and Mississippi 43 Connection – Begins on Jones Street and runs between Mississippi 43 and Mississippi 42, in the Town of New Hebron, Lawrence County.

Mississippi 917– Mississippi 18 Loop – Begins at the intersection of Mississippi 18 at or near the Sylvarena Masonic Lodge and makes what is known as the Sylvarena Loop, coming back into Mississippi 18 at or near the residence of Will Houston, all in Smith County.

Mississippi 923– Mississippi 584 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 584 in the southeast corner of Amite County east of Gillsburg and extends southeast to the Louisiana-Mississippi state line.

Mississippi 927 – Spur – Begins on Mississippi 906 east of Summit and extends north to Southwest Community College, Pike County.

Mississippi 928– U.S. 65 Spur – Begins on U.S. 65 in Natchez and extends north on Homochitto Street, Adams County.

Mississippi 930 and 932 – Begin on U.S. 61 North in Adams County, in the vicinity of the weighing scales and proceed therefrom to the intersection of Melrose Avenue and East Franklin Street.

Mississippi 937– U.S. 84 Spur – Begins on U.S. 84 in south Prentiss and extends north on Columbia Avenue to the railroad crossing, all in Jefferson Davis County.

Mississippi 938 – Begins at the northwest corner of new Mississippi Transportation Department District Office site and extends easterly to U.S. 51 approximately forty-five one-hundredths mile north of the north corporate limits of the City of McComb, Pike County.

Mississippi 946– Mississippi 24 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 24, now Mississippi 33, Amite County, and extends northwest to Centreville, Wilkinson County.

Mississippi 952– Mississippi 513 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 513 and extends north to U.S. 11 in Enterprise, Clarke County.

Mississippi 967– U.S. 49 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 42 in north Hattiesburg and extends south on Main Street, all in Forrest County.

Mississippi 969 – Spur – Begins on U.S. 49 approximately 2.84 miles south of U.S. 11, and extends north on Edwards Street approximately .83 miles, all in Hattiesburg, Forrest County.

Mississippi 992– Mississippi 43 Spur – Begins on Mississippi 43 northwest of Picayune and extends south to Picayune, Pearl River County.

HISTORY: